Washington statutes.
RCW 15.13.440

Order of condemnation—Grounds for issuance. (Effective until July 1, 2030.)

The director shall condemn any horticultural plants shipped or sold when such horticultural plants are found to be dead, in a dying condition, seriously broken, diseased or infested to the extent that treatment is not practical, damaged, frozen, or abnormally potbound. The director shall condemn any Christmas trees shipped or sold if they are found to be diseased, infected, or infested to the extent that treatment is not practical. The director shall order such horticultural plants or Christmas trees to be destroyed or returned at shipper's option.

[ 2007 c 335 s 15; 2000 c 144 s 23; 1993 c 120 s 15; 1990 c 261 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 20.]

NOTES:

Expiration date—2019 c 206; 2013 c 72; 2007 c 335: See note following RCW 15.13.250.

PDFRCW 15.13.440

Order of condemnation—Grounds for issuance. (Effective July 1, 2030.)

The director shall condemn any horticultural plants shipped or sold when such horticultural plants are found to be dead, in a dying condition, seriously broken, diseased or infested to the extent that treatment is not practical, damaged, frozen, or abnormally potbound. The director shall order such horticultural plants to be destroyed or returned at shipper's option.

[ 2000 c 144 s 23; 1993 c 120 s 15; 1990 c 261 s 12; 1971 ex.s. c 33 s 20.]